Nevada, session 83, SB146.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the United Way of Northern Nevada and the Sierra
the sum of $1,400,000 for the United Readers Program.
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the United Way of Northern Nevada and the Sierra agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the United Way
of Northern Nevada and the Sierra through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the United Way
of Northern Nevada and the Sierra through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
-
*SB146*

– 2 –
otherwise, of the United Way of Northern Nevada and the Sierra,
regardless of their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor
deems necessary to conduct an audit of the use of the money
appropriated by subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB146*